Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 1
CORRECTIONS ADMINISTRATION

17-1-101. Executive director - creation - division heads - medical personnel.

The governor, with the consent of the senate, shall appoint an executive director of the department of corrections, who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The reappointment of an executive director after initial election of a governor shall be subject to the provisions of section 24-20-109, C.R.S.

There is hereby created, within the department of corrections, the division of correctional industries, the division of adult parole, and such other divisions and programs as are deemed necessary by the executive director for the safe and efficient operation of the department. The executive director shall organize such divisions and programs in an appropriate manner. Subject to the provisions of section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, the executive director shall appoint the heads of such divisions, and the heads of such divisions shall appoint such personnel as are necessary to carry out the functions of the divisions.

Medical personnel employed at any of the institutions subject to the control of the executive director, the medical director of which is licensed to practice medicine in this state, shall be exempt from the provisions of the "Colorado Medical Practice Act", article 240 of title 12, with respect to service rendered to bona fide patients or inmates at said institutions, if such personnel are licensed to practice medicine in any other state of the United States or any province of Canada, have satisfactorily completed an internship of not less than one year in the United States, Canada, or Puerto Rico in a hospital approved for that purpose by the American Medical Association, have satisfactorily completed three years of postgraduate residency training, or its equivalent, in their particular specialty in a hospital approved for that purpose by the American Medical Association, and can read, write, speak, and understand the English language. Proof of said requirements shall be submitted to and approved or disapproved by the executive director.

All such personnel as cannot satisfy all of the requirements set forth in subsection (3)(a) of this section shall be exempt from the "Colorado Medical Practice Act", article 240 of title 12, with respect to services rendered to bona fide patients or inmates at said institutions, if such personnel are of good moral character, are graduates of an approved medical college as defined in section 12-240-104 (3), have completed an approved internship of at least one year as defined in section 12-240-104 (2), and, within nine months after first being employed, pass the examinations approved by the Colorado medical board under the provisions of the "Colorado Medical Practice Act" and the National Board of Medical Examiners, the National Board of Examiners for Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons, or the Federation of State Medical Boards, or their successor organizations, on subjects relating to the basic sciences, are able to read, write, speak, and understand the English language, and, in the case of personnel who are not citizens of the United States, become citizens within the minimum period of time within which the particular individual can become a citizen according to the laws of the United States and the regulations of the immigration and naturalization service of the United States, or any successor agency, or within such additional time as may be granted by said boards.

Medical personnel granted exemption under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (3) may not practice medicine except as described in this subsection (3) without first complying with all of the provisions of said "Colorado Medical Practice Act".

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 903, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 78:

(3) added, p. 354, § 1, effective April 27.

L. 79:

(3) amended, p. 522, § 26, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1) amended, p. 884, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 829, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2010:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 10-1260), ch. 403, p. 1986, § 73, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1155, § 27, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(3)(a) and (3)(b) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p.1673, § 88, effective October 1.

17-1-102. Definitions.

As used in this title 17, unless the context otherwise requires:

and (1.3) (Deleted by amendment, L. 93, p. 404, § 1, effective April 19, 1993.)

(1.7) "Correctional facility" means any facility under the supervision of the department in which persons are or may be lawfully held in custody as a result of conviction of a crime.

"Department" means the department of corrections.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 602, § 2, effective July 1, 1994.)

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department of corrections.

and (6) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 829, § 2, effective May 24, 2000.)

(6.5) "Inmate" means any person who is sentenced to a term of imprisonment for a violation of the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States.

(6.7) "Inmate liaison" means an inmate's family member or attorney, a government agency, or a representative from an organization with experience in helping inmates apply for special needs parole, high-needs prerelease planning, or reentry. The organization must be in good standing with the Colorado secretary of state for the past twelve consecutive months and the organization's involvement must be at the request of the inmate, or an inmate's family member or attorney should the inmate be unable to make the request.

(7) "Local jail" means a jail or an adult detention center of a county or city and county.

(7.3) "Private contract prison" means any private prison facility in this state operated by a political subdivision of this state or an incorporated or unincorporated business entity; except that "private contract prison" does not include any local jail, multijurisdictional jail, or community corrections center.

(7.4) "Serious impairment that limits a person's ability to function" means a medically diagnosed physical or mental condition that is chronic and long term in nature and severely limits a person's ability to independently perform essential day-to-day activities without daily intervention, attention, or support from an inmate aide or professional caregiver.

(7.5) (a) "Special needs offender" means a person in the custody of the department:

Who is fifty-five years of age or older and has been diagnosed by a licensed health-care provider who is employed by or under contract with the department or by a private licensed health-care provider involved in providing patient care to the inmate as suffering from a chronic infirmity, illness, condition, disease, or behavioral or mental health disorder that causes serious impairment that limits the person's ability to function;

Who, as determined by a licensed health-care provider who is employed by or under contract with the department or by a private licensed health-care provider involved in providing patient care to the inmate, suffers from a chronic, permanent, terminal, or irreversible physical illness, condition, disease, or a behavioral or mental health disorder that requires costly care or treatment and who is incapacitated;

Who is sixty-four years of age or older and has served at least twenty years of the person's sentence and was not convicted of a class 1 or class 2 felony for a crime as defined in section

24-4.1-302 (1)

, unlawful sexual behavior as defined in section

16-22-102 (9)

, a crime that includes domestic violence as defined in section

18-6-800.3 (1)

, or stalking as described in section

18-3-602

; or

Who, as determined by a licensed health-care provider who is employed by or under contract with the department or a competency evaluator as defined in section

16-8.5-101

(3) and approved by the department of human services, on the basis of available evidence, not including evidence resulting from a refusal of the person to accept treatment, is incompetent to proceed and does not have a substantial probability of being restored to competency for the completion of any sentence including a person who has been diagnosed with dementia that renders the person incompetent to proceed. As used in this subsection (7.5)(a)(IV), "competency" has the same meaning as "competent to proceed", as defined in section

16-8.5-101

(5), and "incompetent to proceed" has the same meaning as defined in section 16-8.5-101 (12).

Notwithstanding subsection (7.5)(a) of this section, "special needs offender" does not include a person who:

Was convicted of a class 1 felony and sentenced to life with the possibility of parole and the offender has served fewer than twenty calendar years in a department of corrections facility for the offense;

Was convicted of a class 1 felony and sentenced to life without parole; or

Was convicted of a class 2 felony crime of violence as described in section

18-1.3-406

and the offender has served fewer than ten calendar years in a department of corrections facility for the offense.

This subsection (7.5)(b) does not apply to an inmate who has been diagnosed as having a terminal illness with an anticipated life expectancy of twelve months or less by a licensed health-care provider who is employed by or under contract with the department or by a private licensed health-care provider involved in providing patient care to the inmate.

(8) "State inmate" means any person who is sentenced by the state to a term of imprisonment in a correctional facility or who is sentenced to a term of imprisonment pursuant to section

16-11-308.5

, C.R.S.

(8.5) "Tampering" means intentionally attempting to disable, damage, or destroy an electronic monitoring device so as to render the device nonfunctional in order to avoid supervision.

(9) "Warden" means the administrative head of a correctional facility.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 904, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

Entire section R&RE, p. 685, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1) amended and (1.3), (1.7), and (5) to (8) added, p. 336, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 93:

(1), (1.3), and (7) amended, p. 404, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 94:

(3) amended and (9) added, p. 602, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(5), (6), (8), and (9) amended and (6.5) and (7.3) added, p. 829, § 2, effective May 24; (7.5) added, p. 1495, § 1, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2002:

(7.5)(b)(II) and (7.5)(b)(III) amended, p. 1499, § 156, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(7.5)(a) amended, p. 1910, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2006:

(7.5)(a)(I) amended, p. 1398, § 44, effective August 7.

L. 2011:

(7.5) amended, (SB 11-241), ch. 200, p. 831, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 2014:

(8.5) added, (HB 14-1044), ch. 199, p. 727, § 1, effective May 15.

L. 2017:

IP, (7.5)(a)(I), and (7.5)(a)(II) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1301, § 128, effective May 25.

L. 2018:

(7.5)(a)(I) and (7.5)(a)(II) amended and (7.5)(a)(IV) added, (HB 18-1109), ch. 139, p. 912, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 2019:

(7.5)(a)(IV) amended, (SB 19-223), ch. 227, p. 2292, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(7.3) amended, (HB 20-1019), ch. 9, p. 23, § 1, effective March 6.

L. 2021:

(6.7) and (7.4) added and (7.5) amended, (SB 21-146), ch. 459, p. 3076, § 1, effective July 6.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (7.5)(b)(II) and (7.5)(b)(III), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

17-1-103. Duties of the executive director.

The duties of the executive director are:

To manage, supervise, and control the correctional institutions operated and supported by the state; to monitor and supervise the activities of private contract prisons; to manage and supervise the divisions, agencies, boards, and commissions that are or may be transferred to or established within the department by law or by the executive director pursuant to section

17-1-101 (2)

; to provide work and self-improvement opportunities; and to establish an environment that promotes habilitation for successful reentry into society;

To develop policies and procedures governing the operation of the department;

To supervise the business, fiscal, budget, personnel, and financial operations of the department and the institutions and activities under his or her control;

In consultation with the division directors and the wardens, to develop a systematic building program providing for the projected, long-range needs of the institutions under his or her control;

To efficiently manage the lands associated with or owned by the department;

To the extent practical, to utilize the staff and services of other state agencies and departments, within their respective statutory functions, to carry out the purposes of this title;

To develop within the correctional institutions, rehabilitation and work programs that develop work skills for inmates and supply necessary products for state institutions and other public purposes as specified by law;

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 830, § 3, effective May 24, 2000.)

Repealed.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 830, § 3, effective May 24, 2000.)

To carry out the duties prescribed in article 11.5 of title 16, C.R.S.;

To carry out the duties prescribed in article 11.7 of title 16, C.R.S.;

To provide information to the director of research of the legislative council concerning population projections, research data, and the projected long-range needs of the institutions under the control of the executive director and any other related data requested by the director;

To contract with the department of human services to house in a facility operated by the department of human services any juvenile under the age of fourteen years who is sentenced as an adult to the department of corrections and to provide services for the juvenile pursuant to section

19-2.5-802 (1)(e)

;

To appoint an inspector general and investigators as provided in section

17-1-103.8

;

Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, C.R.S., and part 3 of said article 72, to adopt such policies and guidelines as may be necessary concerning the release of records to inmates;

To collaborate with the department of personnel and the office of information technology on their existing efforts to modernize the state's personnel timekeeping systems in order to produce a system that is transparent, accountable, and easily employed by department personnel;

In consultation with the behavioral health administration and the office of economic security in the department of human services, the department of health care policy and financing, the department of local affairs, and local service providers, to develop resources for inmates post-release that provide information to help prepare inmates for release and successful reintegration into their communities. The resources must reflect the needs of diverse and underserved populations and communities.

The executive director shall have such other duties and functions as are prescribed for heads of principal departments in the "Administrative Organization Act of 1968", article 1 of title 24, C.R.S.

The executive director shall, upon the recommendation of the department's chief medical officer, appoint a panel of medical consultants.
(3) (a) (I) The executive director shall, upon the recommendation of the department's chief medical officer, appoint a panel of medical consultants.

The executive director shall, upon the recommendation of the department's chief medical officer, determine the membership of the panel based on the medical and surgical needs of the department.

The executive director shall determine the qualifications for appointment to the panel of medical consultants; except that all members of the panel shall be licensed by the Colorado medical board pursuant to article 240 of title 12 or the Colorado dental board pursuant to article 220 of title 12.

Members of the panel of medical consultants shall be compensated at a rate which shall be approved by the executive director. Compensation shall be paid from available funds of the department.

The panel members shall act as medical consultants to the department with respect to persons receiving services from any correctional facility as defined in section 17-1-102 (1.7).

A member of the panel of medical consultants, for all activities performed within the course and scope of said member's responsibilities to the department, shall be entitled to all of the protections of the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S., as if the panel member were a "public employee" as defined in section 24-10-103 (4), C.R.S. This provision shall not be construed to afford independent contractors hired as panel members any of the protections of the state personnel system, article 50 of title 24, C.R.S.

For purposes of this subsection (3), "panel of medical consultants" means a panel of medical physicians, dentists, or oral surgeons whose duty is to deliver medical services or services related to oral surgery.

For an inmate who was convicted as an adult of a class 1 felony following direct filing of an information or indictment in the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-801 or transfer of proceedings to the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-802, the executive director shall ensure that the inmate has the opportunity to participate in treatment, programs, and services that is equal to the opportunities granted to other inmates who will be eligible for parole or discharge.

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 904, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 83:

(1)(g) and (1)(h) amended, p. 832, § 30, effective July 1.

L. 88:

(1)(a) amended, p. 696, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(1)(i) added, p. 77, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1)(j) added, p. 941, § 5, effective June 7; (1)(a) amended, p. 976, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1)(k) added, p. 441, § 4, effective May 29.

L. 92:

(1)(l) added, p. 461, § 4, effective June 2.

L. 94:

(2) added, p. 563, § 3, effective April 6; (3) added, p. 772, § 1, effective April 20; (1)(m) added, p. 1097, § 8, effective May 9; (1)(i) repealed, p. 1362, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(3)(a) and (3)(e) amended, p. 879, § 16, effective May 24.

L. 96:

(1)(n) added, p. 1683, § 10, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 98:

(1)(g) amended, p. 726, § 7, effective May 18.

L. 99:

(1)(o) added, p. 424, § 2, effective April 30.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) to (1)(d), (1)(f), (1)(g), (1)(h), (1)(j), and (3)(e) amended and (1)(a.5) and (1)(p) added, p. 830, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 2001:

(1)(g) repealed, p. 1176, § 3, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(4) added, p. 1055, § 8, effective May 25.

L. 2009:

(1)(p) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1948, § 31, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(3)(a)(III) amended, (HB 10-1260), ch. 403, p. 1986, § 74, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1)(q) added, (SB 13-210), ch. 261, p. 1378, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(3)(a)(III) amended, (HB 14-1227), ch. 363, p. 1737, § 43, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(3)(a)(III) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1674, § 89, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

IP(1) amended and (1)(r) added, (HB 20-1017), ch. 288, p. 1425, § 8, effective September 14.

L. 2021:

(1)(n) and (4) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 716, § 32, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(1)(f) amended, (SB 22-050), ch. 51, p. 240, § 1, effective March 30; (1)(r) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1495, § 20, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2006 act enacting subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 228, Session Laws of Colorado 2006.

17-1-103.5. Literacy corrections program - legislative declaration - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 696, § 2, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1991. (See L. 88, p. 696.)

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning the correctional education program, see article 32 of this title 17.

17-1-103.7. Duties of executive director - emergency response time - legislative declaration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 870, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 602, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 831, § 4, effective May 24.

17-1-103.8. Executive director - inspector general - investigators - duties.

The executive director, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, shall appoint a person to the position of inspector general. The person appointed to the position shall report to the executive director and shall have the powers of a peace officer, as described in sections 16-2.5-101 and 16-2.5-134, C.R.S.

(1.5) The executive director, in consultation with the inspector general, shall appoint investigators who shall operate under the inspector general's direct authority. Investigators appointed pursuant to this section shall have the powers of a peace officer, as described in sections 16-2.5-101 and 16-2.5-134, C.R.S.

The inspector general and the investigators under his or her direction shall have the following duties:

To investigate, detect, and prevent any crimes, criminal enterprises, or conspiracies originating within the department and any crimes, criminal enterprises, or conspiracies originating outside correctional facilities if the crimes, criminal enterprises, or conspiracies are related to the safety and security of correctional facilities, public or private. Evidence obtained by the inspector general or an investigator of any crimes so investigated shall be:

Reported to the applicable local law enforcement agency; or

With the consent of the district attorney, reported directly to the district attorney, attorney general, or United States attorney having jurisdiction over the issue; or

In the case of a city and county, reported immediately to the local law enforcement agency, and the agency may complete the investigation and report the findings to the district attorney having jurisdiction over the city and county.

To investigate, detect, and prevent any violations of administrative regulations or state policy and procedure and any waste or mismanagement of departmental resources and corruption that may occur within the department and any other violation that may be committed by department staff where the violation could affect the performance of staff duties or tend to erode public confidence in the performance of the department;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 464, § 1, effective April 14, 2008.)

To conduct preemployment investigations and integrity interviews of all persons who apply for employment with the department, including employment as contractors and subcontractors. The preemployment investigations and integrity interviews shall ensure that department employees meet the minimum standards set forth by state personnel rules, executive orders, and department policies.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 464, § 1, effective April 14, 2008.)

For purposes of this section, "correctional facilities" includes but is not limited to any facility with which the department has contracted to house offenders who are in the legal custody of the department.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 464, § 1, effective April 14, 2008.)

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 422, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 2003:

(1) and (5)(a) amended, p. 1625, § 49, effective August 6.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 464, § 1, effective April 14.

17-1-104. Facilities managed, supervised, and controlled. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 77:

Entire title R&RE, p. 905, § 10, effective August 1.

L. 79:

Entire section R&RE, p. 685, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 831, § 5, effective May 24.

17-1-104.3. Correctional facilities - locations - security level - report.

Each facility operated by or under contract with the department shall have a designated security level. Designation of security levels shall be as follows:

Level I facilities shall have designated boundaries, but need not have perimeter fencing. Inmates classified as minimum may be incarcerated in level I facilities, but generally inmates of higher classifications shall not be incarcerated in level I facilities.

Level II facilities shall have designated boundaries with a single or double perimeter fencing. The perimeter of level II facilities shall be patrolled periodically. Inmates classified as minimum restrictive and minimum may be incarcerated in level II facilities, but generally inmates of higher classifications shall not be incarcerated in level II facilities.

Level III facilities generally shall have towers, a wall or double perimeter fencing with razor wire, and detection devices. The perimeter of level III facilities shall be continuously patrolled. Appropriately designated close classified inmates, medium classified inmates, and inmates of lower classification levels may be incarcerated in level III facilities, but generally inmates of higher classifications shall not be incarcerated in level III facilities.

Level IV facilities shall generally have towers, a wall or double perimeter fencing with razor wire, and detection devices. The perimeter of level IV facilities shall be continuously patrolled. Close classified inmates and inmates of lower classification levels may be incarcerated in level IV facilities, but generally inmates of higher classifications shall not be incarcerated in level IV facilities on a long-term basis.

Level V facilities comprise the highest security level and are capable of incarcerating all classification levels. The facilities shall have double perimeter fencing with razor wire and detection devices or equivalent security architecture. These facilities generally shall use towers or stun-lethal fencing as well as controlled sally ports. The perimeter of level V facilities shall be continuously patrolled.

The correctional facilities operated by the department, the location of such facilities, and the designated security level of such facilities shall be as follows:

Not more than six hundred and fifty beds at the Centennial south campus of the Centennial correctional facility may be operated by the department for the purpose of housing inmates who are close custody inmates. At the discretion of the executive director, the department may house inmates of a lower than close custody level in order to facilitate the movement of inmates displaced as a result of prison closure, during a declared disaster emergency by the governor, or if the lower than close custody inmate is voluntarily assigned to work at the facility, or voluntarily serving as a mentor peer-support, or in another other leadership role as part of departmental programming with the purpose of progressing close custody inmates to lower security levels. The underlying declared disaster emergency must impact state prison operations.

Repealed.

For the purposes of retrofitting the Pueblo minimum center from a level II facility to a level III facility, the department shall expend moneys received from the federal "Jobs and Growth Tax Relief Reconciliation Act of 2003", as amended, Pub.L. 108-27, and shall not request additional capital construction dollars for this purpose.

Subsection (1) of this section shall be construed to set forth the features and general operation status of the facilities described in that subsection. Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed to define or restrict the custody level of inmates placed in the facilities described in that subsection.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 831, § 6, effective May 24, 2000.)

Repealed.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), monthly the department shall submit a project status report on construction and a monthly population and capacity report to the office of state planning and budgeting, the joint budget committee, the capital development committee, and the legislative council. The monthly population and capacity report must include information on state and private contract facilities, including operational capacity for the previous month, the month just ending and capacity changes, on grounds population, and operational capacity for this period in the previous year. The department shall include total beds occupied in each facility, state or private contract, by custody level and by gender. The report shall itemize operational capacities for jail backlog, community corrections, parole, youthful offenders, escapees, and revocations.

Correctional facility

Location

Security level

Colorado state
Fremont county
Level V
penitentiary
Centennial correctional
Fremont county
Level V
facility
Limon correctional
Lincoln county
Level IV
facility
Arkansas Valley
Crowley county
Level III
correctional facility
Buena Vista
Chaffee county
Level III
correctional complex
Colorado Territorial
Fremont county
Level III
correctional facility
Fremont correctional
Fremont county
Level III
facility
Arrowhead
Fremont county
Level II
correctional center
Four Mile
Fremont county
Level II
correctional center
Skyline correctional
Fremont county
Level I
center
Colorado correctional
Jefferson county
Level I
center
Delta correctional
Delta county
Level I
center
Rifle correctional
Garfield county
Level I
center
Colorado correctional
Chaffee county
Level I
alternative program
Denver reception and
City and county
Level V
diagnostic center
of Denver
La Vista correctional
Pueblo county
Level III
facility
San Carlos
Pueblo county
Level V
correctional facility
Sterling correctional
Logan county
Level V
facility
Trinidad correctional
Las Animas county
Level II
facility
Denver women's
City and county
Level V
correctional facility
of Denver
Youthful offender
Pueblo county
Level III
system

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1976, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 873, § 7, effective May 24; (3)(a) amended, p. 1273, § 6, effective June 5.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 1586, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 98:

(4) amended, p. 727, § 8, effective May 18.

L. 2000:

(1), (3), and (4) amended and (5) added, p. 831, § 6, effective May 24.

L. 2001:

IP(1)(b) amended, p. 1271, § 21, effective June 5; (4) repealed, p. 1176, § 4, effective August 8.

L. 2004:

(1)(b) amended, p. 244, § 5, effective April 5; (1)(b) amended, p. 192, § 5, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(1)(b) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 229, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2009:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 09-034), ch. 55, p. 195, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2011:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 11-214), ch. 147, p. 511, § 2, effective March 1, 2012.

L. 2012:

(1)(b.5) added, (HB 12-1337), ch. 144, p. 522, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2017:

(5) amended, (SB 17-031), ch. 92, p. 280, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1699, § 17, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(1)(b.7) added, (SB 19-259), ch. 289, p. 2670, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(1)(b.5) amended and (1)(b.7) repealed, (HB 20-1019), ch. 9, p. 23, § 2, effective March 6.

L. 2021:

(1)(b.5) amended, (SB 21-146), ch. 459, p. 3088, § 13, effective July 6.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(b) by Senate Bill 04-123 and Senate Bill 04-067 were harmonized.

17-1-104.4. Future correctional facility needs. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1091, § 1, effective May 9; (3)(b) amended, p. 2615, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2)(b) and (3) amended and (4), (5), (6), and (7) added, pp. 1277, 1274, §§ 15, 8, effective June 5; (3)(b) amended, p. 638, § 25, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2)(a)(I) amended, p. 1150, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(3)(b) amended and (8) to (10) added, p. 1584, § 1, effective June 4.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 834, § 7, effective May 24.

17-1-104.5. Incarceration of inmates from other states - private contract prison facilities.

The general assembly finds and declares that the importation of prisoners from other states into correctional facilities not operated by the department of corrections is a matter of statewide concern.

No inmate from a state other than Colorado may be received into the state of Colorado and be housed in a private contract prison facility or a prison facility operated by a political subdivision of the state:

Without the express approval of the executive director, which approval shall not be unreasonably withheld; and

Unless the private contract prison facility or a prison facility operated by a political subdivision is designed to meet or exceed the appropriate security level for the inmate.

The department shall develop and rely upon criteria for the protection of the health, safety, and financial interests of the state of Colorado as developed by the executive director.

Upon violation of this section, the executive director may rescind his or her approval pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and must provide at least sixty days notice to the contracting parties of the recision.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 711, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1147, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1237, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2020:

(3) and (4) added, (HB 20-1019), ch. 9, p. 24, § 3, effective March 6.

17-1-104.6. Planning and review requirements - legislative intent.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the construction, expansion, renovation, or improvement of state-built and operated department of corrections facilities is a matter of statewide and not local concern. Therefore, the department, in authorizing and financing the construction, expansion, renovation, or improvement of its facilities, is exempt from regional, county, and local planning requirements, including those specified in section 30-28-110, C.R.S., and those authorized by section 29-20-104, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, whenever the department plans to locate a new corrections facility or expand an existing corrections facility, the department shall submit facility program plans to the governing body of the county or municipality in which the facility is proposed to be located or expanded and afford the governing body an opportunity for advisory review of such plans.

The intent of the general assembly in enacting this section is to clarify the meaning of current law concerning regional, county, and local planning requirements and to clarify that the general assembly never intended to require the department to submit plans to authorize or construct its facilities for approval by local, county, or regional planning authorities. Accordingly, this section is intended to apply to causes of action pending on or filed on or after July 1, 1996.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1147, § 4, effective July 1.

17-1-104.7. Management plan for housing of juveniles - report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1681, § 5, effective January 1, 1997.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 834, § 7, effective May 24.

17-1-104.8. Legislative review of facilities program plans for correctional facilities. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1091, § 1, effective May 9.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 1273, § 7, effective June 5.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1147, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2015:

Entire section repealed, (SB 15-270), ch. 296, p. 1215, § 12, effective June 5.

17-1-104.9. Custody levels for state inmates at private prisons - correctional emergency - definition.

Based upon available appropriations and based upon an annual review by the general assembly, the department is authorized to permanently place state inmates classified as medium custody and below in private contract prisons. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the department may not place state inmates classified higher than medium custody in private contract prisons or in private prison facilities located outside the state of Colorado. This section does not prevent a private contract prison from incarcerating an inmate who has been reclassified to a higher custody designation as a result of an offense committed within the private contract prison. However, it is the intent of the general assembly that the department move any inmate of a higher custody designation out of the private contract prison as soon as space is available at a state-operated correctional facility.

At the request of the executive director, the governor may, in his or her discretion, declare a correctional emergency and by proclamation authorize the department to place state inmates classified higher than medium custody in private contract prisons or in private prison facilities located outside the state of Colorado. A proclamation issued under this subsection (2) shall remain in effect for thirty days.

At the request of the executive director, the governor may, in his or her discretion, renew a declaration of correctional emergency and reissue a proclamation in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) for one or more additional thirty-day periods as the governor deems appropriate.

For purposes of this section, "correctional emergency" means a riot, a disturbance, a homicide, or inmate violence occurring in a correctional facility or in transit to or from a correctional facility, or a situation involving inmates that presents a clear and immediate danger to the safety, security, and control of the department. "Correctional emergency" does not include inmate overcrowding.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 834, § 8, effective May 24.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 658, § 1, effective August 7.